South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-104-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (J)(1) A student who meets the requirements of this section and is enrolled in the South Carolina Teaching Fellows program administered by The Center for Educator Recruitment, Retention, and Advancement is eligible for a supplemental teaching scholarship equal to the student's remaining tuition after the Palmetto Fellows scholarship and the Teaching Fellows scholarship have been applied to the student's tuition. A student who receives a supplemental teaching scholarship pursuant to this subsection shall commit to teach in a South Carolina public school for seven years after graduation. (2) If a student does not teach in a South Carolina public school for seven years after graduation, the student shall return one seventh of the value of the supplemental teaching scholarship described in item (1) for each year of the first seven years after graduation that the student is not a South Carolina public school teacher. A student may apply for a waiver if the student enrolls in a master's degree program related to education. The Department of Revenue may garnish a person's income tax refund for failure to satisfy the financial responsibility requirements of this item. (3) Each year in the annual general appropriations act, the General Assembly shall appropriate the funds necessary to fund the supplemental teaching scholarships awarded pursuant to this subsection. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----